apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3
!! This allows for word end, possessor indices, predication
 K ;
 DER/PR4_OBL ; 
 POSSX4-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3 ;

LEXICON PO-IS-ELA
!! postposition that is in elative case
!! потсто:потсто
%<po%>%<cx_ela%>: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3;

LEXICON PO-IS-INE
!! postposition that is in inessive case
!! потсо:потсо
%<po%>%<cx_ine%>: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3;

LEXICON PO-IS-PRL
!! postposition that is in prolative case
!! перька:перька
%<po%>%<cx_prl%>: PO_POSS-or-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3;

LEXICON Temp-1Arg-Ela
%<po%>%<cx_ela%>%<cx_tmp%>: K ; !This will require Possessor Indices


LEXICON ejs-PO
эйсэ%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:эйс K ;
эйсэ%<po%>%<cx_ine%>:эйсэ _КУДО-Conjugation ;
эйсэ%<po%>%<cx_ela%>:эйстэ _КУДО-Conjugation ;
эйсэ%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:эйз OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;
эйсэ%<po%>%<cx_ine%>:эйсэ POSSX4-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3 ;
эйсэ%<po%>%<cx_ela%>:эйстэ POSSX4-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3 ;
эйсэ%<po%>%<cx_ela%>:эйстэде OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;

LEXICON marto-PO
%<po%>%<com%>: K ;
%<po%>%<com%>: _КУДО-Possessives2 ; 
%<po%>%<der_mwn%>: NMN_КУДО ;


LEXICON PO_КУДО-ILL
%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:%>с K ;
%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:%>з OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;

LEXICON PO_ОШ-ILL
%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:%>с K ;
%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:%>%^О2з OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;

LEXICON Postp-karsho
%<po%>: WORD-END ;
%<po%>: PossMarker-then-Clt ;
%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:%>з OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;

LEXICON vaksso-SPAT
 malaso-SPAT ;
%<po%>%<cx_ela%>:%>О1%>стО1 _КУДО-Conjugation ;
%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:%>О1%>с K ;
%<po%>%<cx_ine%>:%>О1%>сО1 _КУДО-Conjugation ;
%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:%>%^О2з OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;

LEXICON jutkso-SPAT
%<po%>%<cx_prl%>:%>О1%>Г2а POSSX4-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3 ;
%<po%>%<cx_prl%>:%>О1%>Г2а _КУДО-Conjugation ;
 langso-SPAT ;

LEXICON langso-SPAT
%<po%>%<cx_ela%>:%>стО1 _КУДО-Conjugation ;
%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:%>с K ;
%<po%>%<cx_lat%>:%>%^О2в K ;
%<po%>%<cx_ine%>:%>сО1 _КУДО-Conjugation ;
%<po%>%<cx_ela%>:%>стО1 POSSX4-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3 ;
%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:%>О2з OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;
%<po%>%<cx_ine%>:%>сО1 POSSX4-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3 ;

LEXICON PO_КУДО-INE5
!! malaso:mala
%<po%>%<cx_ela%>:%>стО1 POSSX4-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3 ;
%<po%>%<cx_ill%>:%>О2з OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;
%<po%>%<cx_ine%>:%>сО1 POSSX4-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3 ;
%<po%>%<cx_prl%>:%>Г2а POSSX4-END-FOC-DER/PR-SC3 ;
%<po%>%<cx_lat%>:%>в _КУДО-Conjugation ;


! This contlex allows for relational word which, otherwise, are open 
! to extensive declension
LEXICON POSTP_
%<po%>: K ;

LEXICON Dat-1Arg
%<po%>%<dat%>: K ;




LEXICON _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K-or-K 
 K ;
 _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K ;


LEXICON _ОШ-Possessive-Before-K
:%>О1 Possessive-Before-K-noArrow ;

LEXICON _КУДО-Possessive-Before-K
:%> Possessive-Before-K-noArrow ;

!! PRONOUNS

! ============================= !
!  Person morphological lexica !
! ============================= !

LEXICON Dat-Pron
%<pers%>%<dat%>: POSSX4-END-DAT ;

LEXICON Dat-NoArg
%<pers%>%<dat%>: POSSX4-END-DAT ;

LEXICON Ill-Pron
%<pers%>%<cx_ill%>: OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;

LEXICON Interr-Pers
%<interr%>%<pers%>: WORD-END ; ! кие THIS should be depricated

LEXICON PERS

мон%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxsg1%>@P.PossPx.Sg1@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.1@:мо0000@P.PossPx.Sg1@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.1@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
тон%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxsg2%>@P.PossPx.Sg2@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.2@:то0000@P.PossPx.Sg2@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.2@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
сон%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxsg3%>@P.PossPx.Sg3@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.3@:со0000@P.PossPx.Sg3@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.3@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
минь%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxpl1%>@P.PossPx.Pl1@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.1@:ми00000@P.PossPx.Pl1@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.1@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
тынь%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxpl2%>@P.PossPx.Pl2@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.2@:ты00000@P.PossPx.Pl2@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.2@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
сынь%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxpl3%>@P.PossPx.Pl3@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.3@:сы00000@P.PossPx.Pl3@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.3@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;

эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>:эсь PersPron_Minsy-Obliq ;
эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>%<dep%>:эсь WORD-END ;
эсь%<use_sub%>%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>%<der_mwn%>%<pl%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:эсетне K ;
эсь%<use_sub%>%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>:эсетне _КУДО-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>%<der_mwn%>%<pl%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:эсеттне K ;
эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>%<pl%>:эсеттне _КУДО-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;

эсь%<use_sub%>%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxpl3%>%<der_mwn%>%<pl%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:эсестнэ K ;
эсь%<use_sub%>%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxpl3%>%<pl%>:эсестнэ _КУДО-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxpl3%>%<der_mwn%>%<pl%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:эсесттнэ K ;
эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxpl3%>%<pl%>:эсесттнэ _КУДО-PersPronGen_CX-2 ;
!Dealing with short comings! need to be fixed
эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_tra%>%<indef%>:эсетекс K ;
эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>%<der_mwn%>%<pl%>%<cx_tra%>%<indef%>:эсетекс K ;
эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:эсетесь K ;
эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_gen%>%<pxsg2%>%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<def%>:эсетенть K ;
эсь%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_dat%>%<pxpl1%>:эстенек K ;
мон%<dial%>%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxsg1%>%<cx_abl%>:монде K ;
тон%<dial%>%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxsg2%>%<cx_abl%>:тонде K ;

мон%<dial%>%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxsg1%>%<refl%>%<cx_abe%>:монстеме K ;
тон%<dial%>%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxsg2%>%<refl%>%<cx_abe%>:тонстеме K ;

мон%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxsg1%>%<pron%>%<dem%>:монете _КУДО-PersPronGen_CX ;
тон%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pxsg2%>%<pron%>%<dem%>:тонете _КУДО-PersPronGen_CX ;

!! Obligatory Possessor Index

!! Periferal
!
ськамонзо%<pron%>%<exclusive%>%<modifier_perif%>:ськамо N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-PossX ;
ськамнензэ%<pron%>%<exclusive%>%<modifier_perif%>%<der_dim%>:ськамне N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-PossX ; 
ськаминензэ%<pron%>%<exclusive%>%<modifier_perif%>%<der_dim%>:ськамине N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-PossX ; 
ськамнинензэ%<pron%>%<exclusive%>%<modifier_perif%>%<der_dim%>%<der_dim%>:ськамнине N_КУДО-Poss-Declension-PossX ; 
! in the PRON_myv-lex.xml file !Dat-Pron ! тензэ%<pron%>%<dat%>:те PossPX1 ; 

эстензэ%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_dat%>:эсте PossPX1 ; 
эськанзо%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_prl%>:эська PossPX1 ; 
эськанзо%<pron%>%<refl%>%<cx_prl%>%<cx_prl%>:эськава PossPX1 ; 

LEXICON Adverbs
вакссо:вакс vaksso-SPAT  "" ;
лангсо:ланг langso-SPAT  "" ;
LEXICON Verbs
лемс:лемс POSTP_  "" ;
